Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; VEHICLE INSPECTION SITE.new text end new text begin (a) $900,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $650,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705, to the commissioner of public safety for costs of establishing, equipping, operating, and staffing an additional motor vehicle inspection site. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not reduce the number of vehicle inspection sites operating as of January 1, 2025. The commissioner must ensure that there is regional balance in the location of vehicle inspection sites and must maintain two sites in the seven-county metropolitan area that are geographically balanced. new text end